Idaho, session 2026, S1394.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 32-717E, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-717E. SUPERVISED VISITATION -- SUPERVISED ACCESS PROVIDERS --
RECORD CHECKS. (1) If the court orders supervised visitation in proceedings
between parents in which custody and parenting time of a minor child is at
issue, the court shall state in its decision the reasons for supervised visi-
tation. The supervised visitation order shall be reviewed within forty-nine
(49) calendar days of the initial order. Absent good cause shown by clear and
convincing evidence, supervised visitation shall not be ordered or contin-
ued.
(2) All supervised visitation orders shall include clear, objective
conditions for transition to unsupervised parenting time and periodic re-
views at intervals not to exceed ninety (90) days, unless otherwise ordered
by the court for good cause.
(3) Preference shall be given to unpaid supervised access providers
agreed on by the parties.
(4) In cases in which a court has ordered that contact between a per-
son and one (1) or more children shall take place only in the presence of an
approved provider, or where the court has ordered supervised exchanges or
transfers of one (1) or more children, the court may appoint an individual
or entity as a supervised access provider to provide such supervised access
or to facilitate such exchanges or transfers. The qualifications and duties
of supervised access providers shall be as specified in rules adopted by the
supreme court. A supervised access provider who is paid for providing super-
vised access services shall, prior to acting in such capacity and at his or
her own cost, submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history check through
any law enforcement office in the state providing such service. The crimi-
nal history check shall include a statewide criminal identification bureau
check, federal bureau of investigation criminal history check, child abuse
registry check, adult protection registry check and statewide sex offender
registry check. A record of all background checks shall be maintained in the
office of the supreme court of the state of Idaho.
(5) A parent's legitimate inability to attend supervised visitation
shall not be deemed a voluntary relinquishment of time.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the use of
supervised visitation as a punitive measure, leverage, or a substitute for
proof of unfitness.


(7) The provisions of this section apply only to custody and parenting
time determinations between parents and shall not modify, limit, or super-
sede proceedings under chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.